Anna Karenina
Tolstoy Lev Nikolajevic
I'll get revenge, and I'll pay you back.
PART ONE
All happy families look alike, every unhappy family is unhappy in its own way.
It's all mixed up in the house of Oblonski.
The wife found out that the husband had been associated with the former French governess in their home and told her husband that she could not live with him in the same house.
The situation continued for the third day and was painfully felt by the spouses themselves, by all members of the family and by the household.
All members of the family and the household felt that there was no point in living together, and that at every sitting court randomly people were more connected than they were, members of the family and the household of the Oblons.
My wife wouldn't leave her rooms, my husband wouldn't be home for the third day. The children were running all over the house like lost; the English woman had a fight with the housekeeper and wrote a note to her friend asking for a new place; the cook left the yard yesterday at lunchtime; the black cook and the cook asked for a settlement.
On the third day after the fight, Prince Stepan Arkadić of Oblon -- Steve, as he was called -- at a normal hour, 8 a.m., he woke up not in his wife &apos; s bedroom, but in his office, on the safyan couch...
He turned his full, exhausted body on the springs of the couch, as if to sleep again for a long time, on the other hand he hugged his pillow and pressed his cheek against it; but suddenly he jumped up, sat on the couch and opened his eyes.
"Yeah, yeah, how was it? 'I thought he was thinking of a dream.' 'Yes, how was it?
Yes!
Alabin gave dinner in Darmstadt; no, not in Darmstadt, but something American.
Yeah, but Darmstadt was in America.
Yes, Alabin gave lunch on glass tables, yes, and the tables sang: Il mio tesoro, and not Il mio tesoro, but something better, and some little graphs, and they were women," he remembered.
Stepan Arkadyich's eyes were hilarious, and he began to wonder, smiling.
"Yeah, it was good, it was really good.
There was a lot more to it, and you can't even say words and thoughts."
And when he noticed a strip of light on the side of one of the soup bars, he threw his feet off the couch in a fun way, and he found them stitched up by his wife (the present for his birthday last year), wrapped in golden safian shoes and an old, nine-year-old habit, without getting up, reached out to the place where his robe was hanging in his bedroom.
Then he remembered how and why he was sleeping not in his wife's bedroom, but in his office; the smile disappeared from his face, and he shrivelled his forehead.
"Ah, ah, ah! Ahh! 'He snatched away, remembering all that had happened.'
And his imagination was presented again with all the details of the dispute with his wife, all the insolence of his position and the most painful of all his own guilt.
"Yes! She won't forgive and can't forgive.
And the worst part is, it's all my fault, it's my fault, it's not my fault.
That's the drama,' he thought. 'Ah, ah, ah!' 'He condemned with despair, remembering the worst impressions of this quarrel.
It was the first minute that he came back from the theater, happy and happy, with a huge pear for his wife in his hand, and found no wife in the living room. Surprisingly, he also found her in the office, and finally saw her in the unhappy bedroom, opening it up with a note in his hand.
She, who was always anxious and busy, and not far from what he thought she was, Dolly, sat still with a note in her hand, expressing horror, despair, and anger, staring at him.
'What is this? This? 'She asked, pointing to the note.'
And yet, as is often the case, the memory of Stepan Arkadyić was not so much an event as the way he answered his wife's words.
What happened to him at this moment is what happens to people when they're suddenly caught in something too embarrassing. He was unable to prepare his face for the position he had become in front of his wife after the discovery of his guilt.
Instead of insulting, denying, excusing, asking for forgiveness, even being indifferent -- everything would be better than what he did! 'His face is completely involuntarily (the brain reflex,' thought Stepan Arkadych, who loved physiology), suddenly smiled involuntarily with a familiar, kind, and therefore a stupid smile.
He couldn't forgive himself for that stupid smile.
When Dolly saw that smile, she shuddered like a physical pain, burst out of the room, with her own heat, a stream of violent words, and ran out of the room.
She hasn't wanted to see her husband since.
"This silly smile is all my fault," thought Stepan Arkadić.
"But what should I do? What do you want to do?" 'He spoke to himself with despair, and found no answer.'
Stepan Arkadić was a man who was truthful about himself.
He could not deceive himself and assure himself that he repented of what he had done.
He could not now regret that he, a 34 - year - old, handsome, loving man, was not in love with his wife, mother of five living and two dead children, who were only one year younger than him.
He only regretted that he couldn't hide better from his wife.
But he felt the weight of his situation and felt sorry for his wife, children, and himself.
Perhaps he would have been better able to hide his sins from his wife if he had expected this news to affect her.
Clearly, he had never considered the matter, but it seemed vague to him that his wife had long known that he was not faithful to her and looked through her fingers.
He even felt that she, a exhausted, old, ugly woman and nothing wonderful, simple, but a kind mother of the family, should be pardoned in the sense of justice.
It turned out to be really nasty.
"Oh, it's awful! Whoa, whoa, whoa! Awful! 'I kept telling myself Stepan Arkadych, and I couldn't think of anything.' 'And how good it was before this, how good we lived!
She was happy to be with the kids, and I didn't stop her from doing anything, letting her take care of the kids, the farm she wanted.
It's not a good thing she was a governess in our house.
It's not good!
There's something trivial about taking care of your governess. But what a governess!
(He reminiscently remembered the black pluto eyes m-lle Roland and her smile.)
But while she was in our house, I didn't allow myself anything.
And the worst part is, she's already...
Wow, this is all on purpose!
Ouch, ouch, ouch! Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
But what, what shall we do?"
There was no answer, except for the general answer that gives life to all the most difficult and insoluble questions.
The answer is, you have to live up to the needs of the day, that is, forget it.
You can't forget to sleep until at least night, you can't go back to the music that the female graphs sang, so you have to forget the dream of life.
'It will be visible there,' said Stepan Arkadić, and, standing up, put a gray robe on a blue silk lining, cast the brush with a knot, and, by taking the air into his wide chest, the usual brilliant step of his folded legs, so easily carrying his full body, came up to the window, raised the streak and rang loudly.
An old friend, valet Matway, carrying a dress, boots, and a telegram came into the phone immediately.
After Matthew, a barber came in with shaving supplies.
'Is there any paperwork from the presence?' 'Stepan Arkadić asked, taking a telegram and going to the mirror.'
'On the table,' said Matway, looking questionably, with the participation, at the barn, and waiting a little while, adding a sly smile: 'The owner of the cart came from.
Stepan Arkadič answered nothing, and only looked in the mirror at Matway; the look they saw in the mirror showed how they understood each other.
The look of Stepan Arkadyich was like, "Why are you saying this? Don't you know?"
Matthew put his hands in the pockets of his jacket, set his foot aside and silently, kindly, with a little smile, looked at his barn.
'I ordered you to come that Sunday, and until you and yourself were disturbed in vain,' he said, apparently, the phrase prepared.
Stepan Arkadič realized that Matway wanted to make a joke and pay attention to himself.
By tearing the telegram apart, he read it, guessing at the perverted words, as always, and his face lit up.
'Mathaway, Anna Arkadievna's sister will be here tomorrow,' he said, stopping for a moment the glossy, swollen pen of a barber who was clearing the pink road between the long curly buckenbards.
'Thank God,' said Matway, in that response, showing that he understood the meaning of this visit as well as that of the barin, that is, that Anna Arkadyevna, the beloved sister of Stepana Arkadjić, could help to reconcile her husband with her wife.
'On your own or with your spouse?' 'Matway asked.'
Stepan Arkadić could not speak because the barber was busy with the upper lip, and raised one finger. Matway nodded his head in the mirror.
'Alone.
Shall I cook it upstairs?
'Darier Alexandrovna, report where you are ordered.
'Darier Alexandrovna? 'Surely Matway repeats it with doubt.'
'Yes, report.
So take the telegram, tell them what they're gonna say.
'You want to try,' Matway understood, but he said only:
'I'm listening.' Stepan Arkadić had already been washed and combed and was about to dress when Matway returned to his room with his squeaking boots, with a telegram in his hand.
The circulator was gone.
'Daria Alexandrovna was ordered to report that they were leaving.
He said, laughing only with his eyes, and putting his hands in his pockets and leaning his head sideways, staring at the barn.
Stepan Arkadić hasn't spoken. Then a kind and somewhat pathetic smile appeared on his beautiful face.
'Huh? Matway? 'He said, shaking his head.
'Nothing, sir, shall be formed,' said Matway.
'Will it be formed?'
'Yes, sir.
'Do you think?' Who's that? 'Stepan Arkadić asked, hearing the sound of a woman's dress outside the door.
'It's me-s,' said the firm and pleasant woman's voice, and behind the door was the hard-necked face of Matrena Philmonna, the babysitter.
'Well, Matresa? 'Stepan Arkadić asked, walking out to her door.'
Despite the fact that Stepan Arkadych was all responsible for his wife and felt it himself, almost everyone in the house, even the nanny, Darya Alexandrovna's main friend, was on his side.
'Well? 'He said, it was depressing.'
'You go, sir, obey more.
God will give it to me.
They're suffering a lot, and they're looking at pity, and everyone in the house has gone.
Kids, sir, I'm sorry.
Obey, sir. What to do!
Love to ride...
'Cause he won't accept...
'You do yours.
God is merciful, pray to God, sir, pray to God.
'Well, all right, go,' said Stepan Arkadych, suddenly red. 'Well, let's get dressed,' he turned to Matthew and firmly dropped his robe.
Matway's already had something invisible, hamstered, cooked shirt, and it's clearly a pleasure to put a barina's holocaust in it.
III
With his clothes on, Stepan Arkadych jumped on himself with his perfume, adjusted his shirt's sleeves, put him in the pockets of papyros, wallet, matches, double chained and shaved watches, and, by shaking his handkerchief, feeling clean, fragrant, healthy, and physically fun despite his misfortune, went out, slightly poaching on each leg, into the dining room, where he was already waiting for his coffee and, next to his coffee, letters and papers from his presence.
He read the letters.
One was very unpleasant -- from a merchant who bought the woods in his wife &apos; s estate.
The forest had to be sold; but now, before reconciliation with his wife, there could be no talk of that.
All the more unpleasant was the fact that it had added monetary interest to the upcoming case of reconciliation with his wife.
And the idea that he might be guided by this interest that he would seek reconciliation with his wife to sell this forest was an insult to him.
After completing the letters, Stepan Arkadić moved the papers out of his presence, quickly turned two cases over, made some marks with a large pencil, and moved on to coffee; he turned over another raw morning newspaper for coffee and began reading it.
Stepan Arkadić received and read a liberal newspaper, not the extreme, but the direction that the majority held.
And despite the fact that neither science nor art nor politics really interested him, he held firm to the views on all these subjects held by the majority and his newspaper, and changed them only when the majority changed them, or better said he did not change them, and they themselves did not change in it.
Stepan Arkadić did not choose either direction or views, and those directions and views came to him themselves, just as he did not choose the shapes of a hat or a surf, but took the ones he wore.
And to have a view of him, who lived in a well - known society, with the need for some activity of thought, usually developing in the summer of maturity, was as necessary as having a hat.
If there was a reason why he preferred a liberal direction to conservative one that many of his circles also held, it was not because he found a liberal direction more reasonable, but because it was closer to his way of life.
The Liberal Party said that things were bad in Russia, and indeed, Stepan Arkadyich had a lot of debts, and the money was sorely lacking.
The Liberal Party said that marriage was an out-of-date institution and that it was necessary to rebuild it, and indeed, the family life had brought little pleasure to Stepan Arkadyich and forced him to lie and pretend that it was so disgusting to his nature.
The Liberal Party said, or better, that religion was only a curate for the barbaric part of the population, and indeed, Stepan Arkadić could not bear without pain in the legs even a short prayer and could not understand why all those scary and high-minded words about the light, when and on which it would be very fun to live., along with Stepan Arkadyich, who loved the funny joke, sometimes it was nice to surprise the humble man that if he was already proud of the breed, he should not stop on Rürik and reject the first father-in-law -- the monkeys.
So the liberal direction became the habit of Stepan Arkadyić, and he loved his newspaper like a cigar in the afternoon for the light fog it produced in his head.
He read a guiding article that explained that in our time the cry was in vain that radicalism threatened to devour all conservative elements and that the Government was obliged to take action to suppress the revolutionary hydra, which, on the contrary, "in our view, the danger lies not in the perceived revolutionary hydra, but in the persistence of tradition that impedes progress", etc.
He read another article, a financial article that mentioned Bentham and Mill and allowed thin stilts to go to the Ministry.
He understood the meaning of any stiletto — from whom and on whom and on what occasion it was directed — with a sense of urgency, as always.
But today's pleasure was poisoned by the memory of Matron's advice to the Philemonna and the fact that it was so bad in the house.
He also read about the fact that Count Baest had reportedly travelled to Wiesbaden and the fact that there were no more gray hairs, and the sale of a light carriage, and the offer of a young person; but this information did not bring him the quiet, ironical pleasure of the past.
After completing the paper, the second cup of coffee and the butter squash, he stood up, shaked the crumbs of the shovel off his vest and, after dislodging his large breasts, smiled with joy, not because he had something particularly pleasant in his heart, a happy smile caused good digestion.
But that happy smile just reminded him of everything, and he was thinking.
Two children's voices (Stepán Arkadić recognized the voices of Grisha, a smaller boy, and Tanya, an older girl) heard outside the door.
They took something and dropped it.
'I said you can't put passengers on the roof,' the girl screamed in English, 'you pick it up!
"It's all mixed up," said Stepan Arkadych, "there are children running alone." And when he came to the door, he called them.
They threw the box representing the train and went in to see their father.
The girl, the father's favorite, ran in bravely, hugged him and, laughing, hung around his neck, as always, rejoicing at the familiar smell of perfume spread from his buckenbard.
By kissing him, finally, with a red face from a leaning position and a radiant tenderness, the girl opened her hands and wanted to run back; but her father held her back...
'Mom's what? 'He asked, walking with his hand on his daughter's smooth, tender neck. 'Hello,' he said, smiling at a healthy boy.
He knew that he loved the boy less, and he always tried to be a roven; but the boy felt it and did not smile at his father's cold smile.
'Mom?
She stood up,' the girl answered.
Stepan Arkadić sighed. "So he didn't sleep all night again," he thought.
'What, is she fun?
The girl knew there was a fight between her father and her mother, and that the mother couldn't have fun, and that the father should know that, and that he pretended to ask that so easily. And she blushed for her father.
He immediately realized that and also blushed.
'I don't know,' she said. 'She didn't tell me to study, but she told me to go out with Miss Gul to her grandmother.
'Come on, Tanchoka.
Oh, yes, wait,' he said, holding her and ironing her soft pen.
He got out of the fireplace. Where I put it yesterday, I gave her a box of candy, and I gave her two, picking out her favorites, chocolate and lipstick.
'Grisher?' 'The girl said, pointing to the chocolate.'
'Yes, yes. 'And once again touching her shoulder, he kissed her at the roots of her hair, in her neck, and let her go.
'The carriage is ready,' said Matway. 'Yes, the beggar,' he added.
'How long has it been here?' 'Stepan Arkadić asked.'
'At half an hour.
'How many times have you been ordered to report now!
'We must let you eat some coffee,' said Matway with a harsh, friendly tone to which you could not be angry.
'Well, ask quickly,' said Oblonsky, wrinkling with anger.
The applicant, Captain Kalinina's headquarters, asked for the impossible and the stupid; but Stepan Arkadić, by his custom, sat her, listening carefully, without interrupting her, and gave her detailed advice as to whom and how to turn, and even the boyo and folded with his large, stretchy, beautiful and clear handwriting, wrote her a note to the person who could help her.
Let the Captain's headquarters go. Stepan Arkadić took his hat and stopped, remembering if he had forgotten anything.
Turns out he didn't forget anything but what he wanted to forget -- his wife.
"Oh, yes!"
He lowered his head, and a beautiful face accepted his sad expression.
"Go or don't go?" 'He said to himself. And the inner voice told him that it wasn't necessary to walk, that there could be nothing but a fake, that there was nothing to fix, that it was impossible to fix their relationship, because it was impossible to make it attractive again and exciting love or to make it an old man who couldn't love.
Except a lie and a lie, nothing could come out now; and a lie and a lie were against his nature.
"But one day it is necessary; it cannot remain so," he said, while trying to be bold.
He straightened his chest, took out his daddy's, smoked it, suffocated it twice, threw it in a pearlmouth ashtray, walked quickly through a dark living room and opened another door to his wife's bedroom.
Daria Alexandrovna, wearing a sweatshirt and stitched on the back of her head, was already rare, once thick and beautiful hair with a shoveled, skinny face and a large, skinny face, scared of her eyes, standing among the things scattered in the room before an open chiffonier from which she chose something.
When she heard her husband's steps, she stopped looking at the door and in vain trying to give her face a strict and contemptible expression.
She felt afraid of him and afraid of the upcoming date.
She was just trying to do what she was trying to do the tenth time in these three days -- to take away the children and her things that she was taking to her mother -- and she couldn't make up her mind again; but now, just as she did, she told herself that she couldn't stay like that, that she had to do something, punish him, humiliate him, avenge him even a little bit of the pain he had inflicted on her. She still said she was going to leave him, but she felt that it was impossible; it was impossible because she couldn't get used to thinking of him as her husband and loving him.
In addition, she felt that if she could barely care for her five children here in her home, they would be even worse off where she would go with all of them.
And in those three days, he got a little sick because he was fed with a bad broth, and the rest of us were almost out of lunch yesterday. She felt that it was impossible to leave; but by deceiving herself, she still took things and pretended to leave.
When she saw her husband, she put her hand in the chiffonier's drawer like she was looking for something, and she looked back at him only when he came all the way up to her.
But her face, to whom she wanted to give a strict and decisive expression, expressed loss and suffering.
'Dolly!' he said with a quiet, shy voice. He dragged his head into his shoulders and wanted to look pathetic and obedient, but he still shined fresh and healthy.
She quickly glanced from head to toe at his shining freshness and health of the figure.
'Yeah, he's happy and happy!' she thought, 'and me?!..................................
And this kindness is nasty, for which everyone loves him so much and praises him; I hate his kindness," she thought.
Her mouth was humbled, her cheek muscle shook on the right side of the pale, nervous face.
'What do you want? 'She said with a quick, not her own, thoracic voice.'
'Dolly! 'He repeated with trembling in his voice.' 'Anna will come today.
'What am I going to do?'
I can't accept it! 'She cried out.'
'But, look, Dolly...'
'Go away, go away, go away! 'Not looking at him, she cried, as if this scream was caused by physical pain.'
Stepan Arkadić may have been calm when he thought of his wife, could have hoped that everything would be formed, according to Matthew, and could read the newspaper and drink coffee in peace; but when he saw her tormented, suffering face, hearing that sound of voice, humbled to fate and desperate, he was seized by his breath, something came to his throat, and his eyes glistened with tears.
'My God, what have I done!
Dolly!
For God's sake!
'Cause -- he couldn't go on, sobbing stopped in his throat.
She slammed the chiffonier and looked at him.
'Dollie, what can I say?'
One thing: I'm sorry, I'm sorry...
Remember, can't nine years of life atone for minutes, minutes...
She looked down and listened, waiting for him to say, as if begging him to somehow disbelieve her.
'Listen... minutes of passion...' he said, and wanted to continue, but the word, as if it were physical pain, shook her lips again and jumped the cheek muscle on the right side of his face again.
'Go away, get out of here! 'She screamed even more piercing,' and don't tell me about your passions, your abominations!
She wanted to leave, but she shivered and went behind the back of a chair to lean on.
His face was swollen, his lips swollen, and his eyes were filled with tears.
'Dolly! 'He spoke while he was overreacting.' 'For God's sake, think of the children, they are not to blame.
It's my fault, and punish me, tell me to make amends.
Anything I can do, I'm ready!
It's my fault, I can't tell you how guilty I am!
But, Dolly, I'm sorry!
She sat down. He heard her heavy, loud breathing, and he felt incredibly sorry for her.
She wanted to start talking a few times, but she couldn't.
He waited.
'You remember the children to play with them, and I remember and know that they died now,' she said, apparently, one of the phrases she has spoken to herself many times in these three days.
She said to him, "You," and he looked at her with gratitude and touched himself to take her hand, but she turned away from him with disgust.
'I remember the children, and therefore everything in the world would do to save them; but I do not know for myself what I will save them: whether what I will take away from my father or what I will leave with a depraved father -- yes, with a depraved father...'
Well, tell me, after what happened, is it possible for us to live together?
Is that possible?
Tell me, is that possible? 'She repeated, raising her voice.' 'After my husband, the father of my children, is in love with the governess of her children...
'But what shall we do?' What do you want to do? 'He spoke with a pathetic voice, not knowing what he was saying, and all lower and lower in his head.
'You're disgusting, disgusting!' she cried, getting hotter and hotter. 'Your tears are water!
You have never loved me; you have neither a heart nor a grace.
You're disgusting, you're disgusting, you're a stranger, yes, a stranger! 'With pain and anger, she said this terrible word to herself as a stranger.
He looked at her, and the anger that appeared on her face frightened him, and surprised him.
He didn't realize that his pity for her was annoying to her.
She saw him as sorry for herself, but not love.
"No, she hates me. She won't forgive," he thought.
'This is awful! Terrible!-- he said it.
At that time, a child in another room, probably falling down, screamed; Darwina listened, and her face suddenly softened.
She must have remembered for a few seconds, as if she didn't know where she was and what to do, and, when she got up quickly, she touched the door.
'But she loves my child,' he thought, seeing her face changed at the cry of the child,'my child; how can she hate me?'
'Dollie, one more word,' he said, following her.
'If you follow me, I will call the people, the children!
Let everyone know you're a scoundrel!
I'm leaving now, and you live here with your mistress!
And she came out slamming the door.
Stepan Arkadić sighed, wiped his face, and walked quietly out of the room.
"Matway says, "it will be formed; but how?
I don't even see an opportunity.
Ah, that's awful!
And how trivially she cried,' he said to himself, remembering her screaming and her words, a scoundrel and a mistress. 'And maybe the girls have heard!
Terrible trivial, awful."
Stepan Arkadić stood for a few seconds alone, wiped his eyes, sighed, and straightened his chest out of the room.
It was Friday, and the German clockmaker was making a watch in the dining room.
Stepan Arkadych remembered his joke about this neat, slutty watchmaker that the German "has been turned on for life to start a clock" -- and smiled.
Stepan Arkadić loved a good joke.
"Maybe it's gonna work out!
A good word: it will be formed,' he thought. 'This has to be told.'
'Mathaway!' he cried, 'So set things up with Mary in the couch for Anna Arkadyevna,' he said to Matway who appeared.
'I'm listening.'
Stepan Arkadić put on his coat and went out on the porch.
'Will you not eat at home?' 'Said Matway, the companion.'
'As you have to.
Here's the money,' he said, serving ten rubles out of his wallet. 'Will it be enough?'
'Absolutely enough. Not enough, I can see it is necessary,' said Matway, closing the door and retreating to the porch.
Daria Alexandrovna, in the meantime, calmed the child and sounded the carriage knowing that he had left and returned to the bedroom. It was the only safe haven she had from her home cares that would have messed with her as soon as she left.
Now and now, in the short time that she was going out to the nursery, the English woman and Matron Philemononna had time to ask her a few questions, which were not urgent, and to which she alone could answer: What should she wear to the children's walks? Do you want to give milk? Shouldn't we send for another cook?
'Oh, leave me alone, leave me alone! 'She said, and when she returned to the bedroom, she sat back to the same place where she spoke to her husband, squeezing her hands with the rings coming down from her bony fingers, and began to recapture the entire previous conversation.
He's gone!
But how did he end up with her? 'I thought she did.' 'Does he see her?'
Why didn't I ask him?
No, no, you can't get together.
If we stay in the same house, we're strangers.
Forever to strangers!" 'She repeated again with a special meaning that is a terrible word for her. "And how I loved, my God, how I loved him!
How I loved it!
And now don't I love him?
Isn't that more than I've ever loved him?
Terrible, most importantly, she started, but she didn't finish her thought because Matrena Filimonna came out of the door.
'Of course, order your brother to send,' she said, 'all he will make lunch; otherwise the children are not Jewish until six o'clock yesterday.
'Well, all right, I'll be right out and I'll take care of it.
Did they send for fresh milk?
Then Daria Alexandrovna drowned in the troubles of the day, and drowned in them for a while her grief.
Stepan Arkadić attended school well because of his good abilities, but he was lazy and slutty and therefore came out of the latter; but despite his always wandering life, small responsibilities, and old years, he held an honorary and well-paid chiefship in one of Moscow's presences.
He received this place through the husband of Anna's sister, Alexey Alexandrovich Karenin, who was one of the most important places in the ministry to which he belonged; but if Karenin had not assigned his brother-in-law to that place, then through a hundred other persons, brothers, sisters, relatives, cousins, cousins, uncles, aunts, Steve Oblonsky would have received this place or other such, thousands of salaries he needed because of his deeds. In spite of the wife's condition, they were upset.
Half of Moscow and Petersburg were relatives and friends of Stepan Arkadjić.
He was born among those who were and became powerful in this world.
One third of the people of the state, the elderly, were friends of his father and knew him in his shirt; the other third were with him on "you" and the third were well acquainted; therefore, the people who distributed the earth's goods in the form of places, rents, concessions and the like were all his mates, and could not circumvent their own; and Oblonsky did not have to make a special effort to gain a place of advantage; it was only necessary not to refuse, not to be jealous, not to fight, not to be offended, what he had never done according to his kindness.
It would have been funny for him if he had been told that he wouldn't get the job with the salary he needed, especially since he didn't demand anything extraordinary; he only wanted what his peers had, and he could have done as much as any other.
Not only did Stepana Arkadiča love all those who knew him for his good, funny temper and unmistakable honesty, but there was something in him, in his beautiful, bright appearance, brilliant eyes, black eyebrows, hair, whiteness and brown face, that was physically friendly and fun for people who met him.
"Yeah!
Steve! Oblonsky!
There he is!" 'Almost always, with a happy smile, they spoke with him.'
If it happened sometimes that after talking to him, nothing particularly happy happened -- on the other day, on the third day, again, everyone was just as happy when they met him.
For the third year, Stepan Arkadić took over the position of head of one of the places present in Moscow, except for love, and the respect of fellow workers, subordinates, superiors, and all those who cared about him.
The main qualities of Stepan Arkadiych, who deserved this common respect in his service, were, first, to be extremely lenient towards people based on his own consciousness of his shortcomings; secondly, to be completely liberal, not the one he read out in the papers, but the one he had in his blood and with whom he was completely equal and equal to all people, no matter what condition and rank they were, and thirdly, most importantly, to be completely indifferent to the case he had been doing, so that he had never been attracted to and made any mistakes.
Upon arriving at his place of service, Stepan Arkadych, walking by a respectful doorman, went into her small office with a briefcase, put on a uniform, and entered the presence.
The writers and the servants all stood up, bowing in a jolly and respectful manner.
Stepan Arkadič has rushed, as always, to his place, shake hands with the cocks and sit down.
He joked and talked as much as it was proper, and started class.
No one better than Stepan Arkadyić could find that border of freedom, simplicity and officiality that was needed for pleasant business.
The secretary, as well as everyone in the presence of Stepan Arkadyić, came up with the papers and said to the family-liberal tone that was introduced by Stepan Arkadic:
'We have thus obtained information from the Penzen government of the Republic.
Here, would you like to...
'Did you finally get it?' 'Spoken to Stepan Arkadić, putting his finger on the paper.' 'Well, gentlemen...' And the presence began.
"If they had known," he thought, with a great deal of inclination in the hearing of the report, "what a guilty boy half an hour ago their chairman was!" 'And his eyes laughed when he read the report...'
Up to 2 p.m., classes were to be held without interruption, and at 2 p.m., breaks and breakfast.
There weren't two hours before the big glass doors of the presence halls suddenly opened and someone came in.
All the dicks from under the portrait and from the scratch, looking back at the door after the entertainment; but the watchman standing by the door immediately drove out the enterer and locked the glass door behind him.
When the case was read, Stepan Arkadić stood up, reaching out, and, while paying tribute to the liberality of time, took out a papyroska in front of him and went to his office.
Two of his comrades, the old maid Nikitin and the Yunker Greenevich, went out with him.
'We shall finish after breakfast,' said Stepan Arkadić.
'How else can we make it!' said Nikitin.
'And the slut should be decent with this Fomin,' said Greenevich of one of the people involved in the case they were dealing with.
Stepan Arkadić groaned at Greenevich's words, making it feel inappropriate to make judgment early, and he didn't respond.
'Who came in? 'He asked the watchman.'
'Someone, Your Excellency, broke in without asking, but I turned away.
You were asked.
I say, when the dicks come out, then...
'Where is he?
'Neko went out into the hay 'cause everyone was walking around.
The same one, said the watchman, pointing to a heavily folded, broad-weared man with a curled beard who, without taking off the lamb's hat, quickly and easily climbed up the wiped steps of the stone ladder.
One of those who went down with the briefcase, a skinny official stopped and looked unconscionably at the runner's feet and then took a question-and-answer look at Oblonsky.
Stepan Arkadić was standing over the stairs. His good radiant face, because of the stitched collar, shined even more when he found out who was running.
'It is!
Levin, finally! 'He spoke with a friendly, laughing smile, looking at Levin who approached him.' 'How come you're not sneaking around to find me in this bucket?' 'Stepan Arkadić said, not content to shake his hand and kiss his friend.' 'How long has it been?'
'I am here now, and I very much wanted to see you,' answered Levin, shyly, yet angry and anxiously looking around.
'Well, let's go to the office,' said Stepan Arkadych, who knew his friend's self-absorbed and angry shyness; and when he grabbed his hand, he led him along as if he were between the dangers.
Stepan Arkadić was on the "you" with almost all of his acquaintances: 60-year-olds, 20-year-old boys, actors, ministers, merchants, and general adjutants, so very many of his former "you" were at two extremes of the public ladder and would be surprised to learn that they had something in common through Oblonsky.
He was on "you" with everyone he drank champagne with, and he drank champagne with everyone, and so, in the presence of his subordinates, by meeting his shameful "you" as he called joking with many of his buddies, he, with his own tact, was able to reduce the trouble of that impression for the subordinates.
Levin was not a ashamed "you," but Oblonsky felt with his tact that Levin thought that he might not want to show his closeness to him, so he hastened to take him to the office.
Levin was with Oblonski for almost one year and with him on "you" for more than one champagne.
Levin was his companion and friend of his first youth. They loved each other in spite of their differences in character and tastes, as each other's buddies in their first youth loved.
Yet, as is often the case among people who have chosen different kinds of activities, each of them, though he reasoned and justified the other's activities, despised her in the heart.
Everyone thought that the life he was leading was one real life, and that a friend was only a ghost.
Oblonsky couldn't hold on to an easy laughing smile when he saw Levin.
He once saw him coming to Moscow from a village where he was doing something, but exactly what, that Stepan Arkadych never understood well, and he wasn't interested.
Levin had always come to Moscow excited, hasty, a little shy and annoyed by this shyness and much more with a completely new, unexpected view of things.
Stepan Arkadych laughed at it and loved it.
In the same way, Levin despised and laughed at his friend's urban way of life and his service, which he thought was nothing.
But the difference was that Oblonsky, in doing what everyone was doing, laughed with self - confidence and kindness, and Levin was not presumptuous and sometimes angry.
'We've been waiting for you for a long time,' said Stepan Arkadić, entering the office and releasing Levin's hand, as if to show that the danger was over. 'It is very, very good to see you,' he continued. 'Well, what are you doing?
How?
When did you get here?
Levin was silent, looking at the faces of two friends of Oblonsky, and especially at the hand of an elegant Greenevich, with such white long fingers, with such long yellow, folded at the end of his fingernails, and with such huge shiny cufflinks on his shirt that those hands apparently absorbed all his attention and did not give him freedom of thought.
Oblonsky immediately noticed it and smiled.
'Yes, let me introduce you,' he said. 'My comrades, Philippe Ivanich Nikitin, Michael Stanislavić Greenevich,' and turning to Levin, 'the earthly figure, the new earthly man, the gymnast raising five poodles with one hand, the pastoralist and hunter, and my friend, Konstantin Dmitrich Levin, the brother of Sergei Ivanich Koznyshev.
'It is a pleasure,' said the old man.
'I have the honour to know your brother, Sergei Ivanovic,' said Greenevich, serving his thin hand with long fingernails.
Levin frowned, shook his hand coldly, and immediately turned to Oblon.
Although he had great respect for his brother, known all over Russia, the writer, but he hated being treated not as Konstantin Levin but as the brother of the famous Koznyshev.
'No, I am no longer an earthly figure. He said, "I have broken up with all of them, and I do not go to meetings anymore," he said, turning to Oblonsky.
'In no time! 'Oblonsky said with a smile. 'But how? Why?
'Long story. I'll tell you one day,' said Levin, but now I'm telling you. 'Well, briefly, I have made sure that there is no earthly activity, nor can there be,' he said, as if someone had offended him now, 'on the one hand, a toy played in parliament, and I am neither young enough nor old enough to have fun with toys; on the other hand, it is a means for county coterie to make money...'
There used to be guardianship, courts, and now the earth, not in the form of bribes, but in the form of an unfair salary,' he said so hotly, as if any of those present had challenged his opinion.
'Ege!
You, I see, are back in a new phase, in a conservative phase,' said Stepan Arkadić. 'But after that, though.'
'Yes, after.'
But I needed to see you,' said Levin, looking with hatred at Greenevich's hand.
Stepan Arkadić smiled a little bit.
'How did you say you would never wear a European dress again?' 'He said, looking around his new, apparently French tailor, dress. 'That's it! I see a new phase.
Levin suddenly blushed, but not as the adults blush -- slightly unaware of it, but as the boys are blushing -- feeling that they are laughing at their shyness and, as a result, becoming more ashamed and red, almost to tears.
And it was so weird to see this smart, manly face in such a childish state that Oblonsky stopped looking at it.
'Yes, where will I see you?'
'Cause I really, really need to talk to you,' said Levin.
It's like Oblonsky's thinking:
'Here's the thing: Let's go to Gurin's for breakfast and talk there.
I'm free until three.
'No,' said Levin, thinking, 'I still have to go.
'Well, well, so lunch together,
'Would you like to have lunch?'
It's not a big deal, just say two words, ask, and then we'll talk.
'Now say two words, but talk at lunch.
'Two words are these,' said Levin, 'but nothing is special. His face suddenly accepted an evil expression from an effort to overcome his shyness.
'What are the Shcherbatskys doing?'
Everything's the same? 'He said.'
Stepan Arkadić, who had long known that Levin had been in love with his sister-in-law Kitty, smiled a little bit, and his eyes glittered.
'You said two words, and I can't answer in two words because...
Excuse me for a minute...
The secretary came in with a family respect and some, common to all secretaries, a modest sense of superiority before a superior in the knowledge of affairs, came up with papers to Oblonski and became, under the guise of a question, an explanation of some difficulty.
Stepan Arkadić put his hand on the secretary's sleeve without listening.
'No, you do as I said,' he said, with a soft smile, and, briefly explaining how he understands the matter, moved the papers and said, 'Do so. Please, so, Zahar Nikitich.
The messed-up secretary's gone.
Levin, in his meeting with the secretary, completely recovered from his embarrassment, stood on both sides of the chair, and his face was filled with ridicule.
'I don't understand, I don't understand,' he said.
'What don't you understand? 'The same fun smiling and delivering to the papyross,' said Oblonsky.
He was waiting for Levin to do something weird.
'I do not understand what you are doing,' said Levin, shaking his shoulders. 'How can you seriously do that?'
'Why?
'Cause there's nothing to do.
'You think so, but we're full of business.'
'Which is paperwork.'
Yes, you have a gift to that,' Levin added.
'I mean, do you think I have a lack of something?'
'Maybe so,' said Levin. 'But yet I look forward to your greatness and I am proud that I have such a great friend.
But you did not answer my question,' he added, with desperate effort, looking straight into the eye of Oblonski.
'All right, all right, all right.
Hang on a second, and you're gonna come to it.
Good, like you have 3,000 tithes in Karazin County, and so much muscle and freshness as a 12-year-old girl -- and you will come to us.
Yeah, so you asked me no change, but it's a shame you haven't been in so long...
'Why? 'Scaredly asked Levin.'
'Nothing,' answered Oblonsky. 'We'll talk.
Why are you actually here?
'Oh, let's talk about it after, too,' said Levin, back to his ears red.
'Well, good. I see,' said Stepan Arkadić. 'You see, I would have called you to my house, but your wife is not well.'
Well, if you want to see them, they're probably in the Zoological Garden from four to five these days.
Kitty's skating.
You go there and I'll stop by and have lunch together.
'Great, goodbye.
'Look, I know you, you'll forget or you'll go to the village! 'Cause he laughed, yelled at Stepan Arkadych.
'No, that's right. And when he remembered that he had forgotten to bow to the comrades of Oblon, only when he was already at the door did Levin come out of his office.
'The gentleman must be very energyful,' said Greenevich, when Levin came out.
'Yes, Father,' said Stepan Arkadić, shaking his head. 'He is a lucky man!'
Three thousand tens in Karazin County, all ahead, and how much freshness!
Not like our brother.
'Why do you complain, Stepan Arkadych?
'Oh, it's bad, it's bad,' said Stepan Arkadić, with a heavy sigh.
When Oblonsky asked Levin why he actually came, Levin blushed and became angry at himself for blushing because he couldn't answer him, "I came to propose to your sister-in-law," even though that's all he came for.
The houses of the Levins and the Shcherbatskys were old noble houses of Moscow, and they were always close and friendly to each other.
This bond became even stronger during Levin's studentship.
He studied together and joined the university with Prince Sherbatsky, his brother Dolly and Kitty.
At that time Levin often visited the Shcherbatsky house and fell in love with the Shcherbatsky house.
Strange as it may seem, Konstantin Levin was in love with the house, the family, especially the female half of the Shcherbatsky family.
Levin himself did not remember his mother, and his only sister was older than him, so in the house of the Shcherbatskys he first saw the very environment of the old noble, educated and honest family, to which he was deprived of the death of his father and mother.
All the members of this family, especially the female half, seemed to him to be covered with some mysterious, poetic veil, and not only did he not see any shortcomings in them, but under that poetic veil they had the most lofty feelings and all kinds of perfection.
Why did these three ladies have to speak French and English in a day's time; why, in a well-known hour, they had to exchange pianos, the sound of which was always heard from their brother upstairs, where the students were studying; why those teachers of French literature, music, paintings, dances; why, during a well-known hour, all three ladies with m-lle Linon had to ride in a wheelchair to Tver boulevard in their atlas boulevards -- Dolli in a long, Natalie in a semi-long world, and Kitty in a perfectly short one, so that her steaked legs in that tight red stocking stocking were all visible; why they had to walk around the Tver boulevard -- all this and much else that was done in their mysterious world -- he didn't realize that everything that was being done there was beautiful, and he was in love with this mysterious act.
During his high school, he almost fell in love with the oldest, Dolly, but she was soon married to Oblonsky.
Then he started falling in love with the other one.
He felt like he needed to fall in love with one of his sisters, but he couldn't figure out which one.
But Natalie just showed up, married Lvov's diplomat.
Kitty was still a child when Levin left the university.
The young Shcherbatsky drowned in the Baltic Sea, and Levin's relationship with the Shcherbatskys, despite his friendship with Oblonski, became more rare.
But this year, at the beginning of winter, Levin came to Moscow after a year in the village and saw the Shcherbatskys, he realized which of the three he was really destined to fall in love with.
It would seem that nothing could be easier for him, a good breed, more rich than a poor man, thirty-two years old, to propose to Princess Scherbatsky; in all likelihood, he would immediately be recognized as a good party.
But Levin was in love, and therefore he felt that Kitty was so perfect in all respects, such a creature above all the earth, and he was such an earthly lowlife that there could be no thought of others and she herself finding him worthy of it.
After spending two months in Moscow, almost every day, seeing Kitty in the light of where he went to meet her, Levin suddenly decided that it could not be, and left for the village.
Levin's conviction that this could not be the case was based on the fact that in the eyes of his family he was an unprofitable, unworthy party for the adorable Kitty, and Kitty himself could not love him.
In his family &apos; s eyes, he had no usual, certain activity and position in light, while his comrades now, when he was thirty-two years old, were already -- which was a colonel and a plague adjuant, who was a professor who was the director of the bank and railways or chairman of the presence, like Oblonski; he (he knew very well what he should have seemed to others) was a farmman who was engaged in raising cows, shooting dulls and constructions, that is, a giftless little man, from whom nothing had come out, and who, by the way of society, was doing the very thing that people who weren &apos; t good at.
The most mysteriously adorable Kitty could not love as ugly as he thought he was, a man, and above all, such a simple, unsurprising man.
In addition, his previous relationship with Kitty, an adult relationship with a child due to his friendship with her brother, seemed to him to be a new barrier to love.
The ugly, kind man he thought could, he thought, love as a friend, but in order to be loved by the love he himself loved Kitty, he had to be handsome and, above all, a special person.
He had heard that women often loved ugly, ordinary people, but did not believe it because they judged on their own because they could only love beautiful, mysterious, and special women.
But after two months alone in the village, he became convinced that it was not one of the lovers he had experienced in his first youth; that the feeling did not give him minutes of rest; that he could not live without deciding whether or not she would be his wife; and that his despair was only from his imagination, that he had no proof that he would be denied.
And now he's come to Moscow with a firm decision to propose and get married if he's accepted.
Or... he couldn't think about what would happen to him if he was refused.
When Levin arrived with the morning train to Moscow, he stopped at his older brother's mother, Koznyshev, and changed his clothes and entered his office, immediately intending to tell him why he had come, and to ask his advice: but the brother was not alone.
He had a well-known professor of philosophy who came from Kharkov, actually, to explain the misunderstanding that had arisen between them on a very important philosophical issue.
The professor held a heated debate against the materialists, and Sergei Koznyshev followed this debate with interest and, after reading the Professor's latest article, wrote to him in his letter his objections; he reproached the professor for making too many concessions to the materialists. And the professor came here right away to bump into you.
It was a fashionable question: is there a boundary between mental and physiological phenomena in human activity, and where is it?
Koznyshev met his brother with his usual sweet, cold smile and, after introducing him to the professor, continued the conversation.
A little yellow man wearing glasses, with a narrow forehead, was distracted for a moment from talking to say hello, and continued his speech, ignoring Levin.
Levin sat down waiting for the professor to leave, but soon became interested in the subject matter of the conversation.
Levin met the articles in the magazines and read them, interested in them, as the development of his acquaintances, as a naturalist in the university, as the basis of natural knowledge, but never brought these scientific conclusions about the origin of man as an animal, the reflexes, biology, and sociology closer to the meaning of life and death to himself, which has come to his mind more often and more often recently.
Listening to his brother's conversation with the professor, he noticed that they had connected scientific questions to the soul, that they almost approached these questions a few times, but every time they came close to what seemed to be the main thing, they immediately moved away and went further into the field of thin units, reservations, quotations, hints, references to authority, and he found it difficult to understand what they were talking about.
'I cannot allow it,' said Koznyshev, with the usual clarity and elegance of the expression and the grace of the instruction, 'I cannot agree with Keyes in any way that my whole view of the outside world should flow from impressions.
The most basic notion of being has not come to my senses, for there is no special body to convey it.
'Yes, but they, Wurst, and Knaust, and the supplies, will tell you that your consciousness of being comes from the sum of all the senses that this consciousness of being is the result of feeling.'
Wurst even clearly says that if there's no feeling, there's no concept of being.
'I say the opposite,' Koznyshev began...
But Levin again felt that they went back to the top, and he decided to ask the professor a question.
'So if my feelings are destroyed, if my body dies, there can be no existence?' 'He asked.'
Professor with annoyance and as if mental pain from the break looked back at a strange questioner who looked more like a driller than a philosopher, and turned his eyes to Sergei Ivanovich, as if asking: What is there to say?
But Koznyshev, who spoke with the wrong energy and unilaterality as a professor, and who had left room in his head to respond to the professor and together understand the simple and natural point of view with which the question had been made, smiled and said:
'This is a question we do not yet have the right to decide...'
'We have no data,' confirmed the professor and continued his arguments. 'No,' he said, 'I point out that if, as the Reserves clearly say, feel and have an impression, then we must strictly distinguish between these two concepts.
Levin did not listen anymore and waited for the professor to leave.
When the professor left, Sergei Ivanovic turned to his brother:
'I'm very glad you're here.
For how long?
What's the farm?
Levin knew that the household was of little interest to the older brother and that he had asked him about it only by making a concession, so he only responded about the sale of wheat and money.
Levin wanted to tell his brother about his intention to marry and to ask his advice, he even decided to do so firmly; but when he saw his brother, he listened to his conversation with the professor, when he heard that involuntary patronymic tone with which the brother had asked him about his business (their mother's property was weekly and Levin was in charge of both parts), Levin felt that he could not, for some reason, begin talking to his brother about his decision to marry.
He felt that his brother wasn't going to look at it the way he wanted.
'Well, what's your land like? 'Ask Koznyshev, who was very interested in the earth and attributed him great importance.
'Oh, right, I don't know...'
'How?
You're a member of the board, aren't you?
'No, I'm not a dick; I'm out,' answered Constantin Levin, 'and I don't go to meetings anymore.
'That's too bad! 'Speaked Sergei Ivanovic, frowning.'
Levin spoke in defense of what he had done at the meetings in his village.
'That's always how it is! 'Cause Koznyshev interrupted him. 'We Russians are always like this.
This may be a good feature of ours -- the ability to see our shortcomings, but we oversell, we comfort ourselves with the irony that we always have in our language.
I'll just tell you that if you gave the same rights as our Earth institutions, to the other European people -- the Germans and the English would create freedom out of them, and we're just laughing.
'But what shall we do?' 'It was Levin's fault. 'This was my last experience.
And I tried my best.
I can't.
Impossible.
'Impossible,' said Koznyshev, 'you are not looking at the case like this.
'Maybe,' Levin answered with sadness...
'And you know, Brother Nikolai is here again...'
Nikolai's brother was Konstantin Levin's brother and his half-brother, Sergei Ivanovich, who had lost a greater share of his fortune, who had been spinning in the strangest and worst society, and who had been sniffing with his brothers.
'What are you saying? 'Scaredly cried Levin.'
'How do you know?
'Procofius saw him on the street.
'Here in Moscow?'
Where is he?
You know? 'Then Levin stood up from his chair, as if he were going to walk immediately.'
'I regret that I told you this,' said Sergei Ivanovic, shaking his head on the worry of his younger brother. 'I sent him to find out where he lived, and I sent him his Tube, on which I paid.
That's what he said to me.
And Koznyshev gave his brother a note from the press.
Levin read a strange handwriting written by his family: "Please leave me alone.
That's one thing I'm asking of my kind brothers. Nikolai Levin."
Levin read this and, without raising his head, with a note in his hand stood before Sergei Ivanovic.
In his heart there was a desire to forget his unhappy brother and to realize that it would be bad.
'He obviously wants to insult me,' he continued, 'but he cannot insult me, and I would love to help him with all my heart, but I know that this cannot be done.
'Yes, yes,' said Levin. 'I understand and appreciate your attitude toward him; but I will go to him.
'If you want to go, go, but I do not advise,' said Koznyshev. 'I mean, as far as I'm concerned, I'm not afraid of it; he won't join me; but for you, I advise you not to go.
You can't help me.
Anyway, do what you want.
'It may not be possible to help, but I feel, especially at this moment -- well, it is another -- I feel that I cannot be calm.
'Well, I don't understand that,' said Koznyshev. 'I understand one thing,' he added, 'it is a lesson in humility.
That's not how I began to look at what's called sneaky after Nikolai's brother became what he is...
You know what he did...
'Oh, that's awful, awful! 'I repeat it to Levin.
After receiving the address of his brother from the footman Sergei Ivanovic, Levin was about to go to him immediately, but after thinking, he decided to postpone his journey until the evening.
First of all, in order to have peace of mind, it was necessary to resolve the matter for which he had come to Moscow.
From his brother Levin went to the presence of Oblonsky and, after learning about the Shcherbatskys, went to a place where he was told that he could catch Kitty.
At four o'clock, when he felt his beating heart, Levin cried from the train at the Zoological Garden, and went down the road to the mountains and the rink, probably knowing that he would find it there, because he saw a carriage of Shcherbatskys at the entrance.
There were carriages, sleigh, baths, gendarmes at the entrance. The pure people, glittering in the bright sun with their hats, crawled at the entrance and on the clear paths, between Russian houses with cut princes; the old curly birches of the garden, which were hanging all branches from the snow, seemed to have been ripped apart into new solemn rises.
He walked down the road to the skating wheel and said to himself, "Don't worry, you have to calm down.
What are you talking about?
What are you doing?
Silence, stupid,' he turned to his heart.
And the more he tried to calm himself, the worse his breath got.
A friend met him and called him, but Levin didn't even know who it was.
He came up to the mountains, where the chains of descending and lifting sleds were clattering, the crawling sleds were sounding, and the voices were hilarious.
He went a few more steps, and the skating was opened to him, and immediately he recognized her among all the skating people.
He learned that she was here for the joy and fear that engulfed his heart.
She stood talking to the lady at the opposite end of the rink.
Nothing seemed to be special in her clothes or in her pose; but it was as easy for Levin to know her in that crowd as a rose in a ravine.
Everything was covered by her.
She was a smile that brightened everything around her.
"Can I go over there, on the ice, get to her?" 'He thought.'
The place where she was seemed more inaccessible to him, and the minute he almost left, he became so terrified.
He needed to make an effort to think that people of all kinds were walking around her, that he himself might have come there skating.
He went down, avoiding long looking at her as in the sun, but he saw her as the sun, without looking.
On the ice this day of the week and at this time of the day, the people of the same club, all of whom knew each other.
There were also craftsmen who used to ride with art, and who studied behind chairs, with shy movements, and boys, and old men who rode for hygiene; they all seemed to Levin happy, because they were here near her.
All the skating seemed to be completely indifferently overtaking, catching up with her, even talking to her, and having fun completely independently of her, using fine ice and good weather.
Nikolai Shcherbatsky, Kitty's cousin, in a short jacket and tight pants, sat with skates on his feet on the bench, and when he saw Levin, he cried out to him:
'Ah, the first Russian skater!
How long?
Nice ice, put your skates on.
'I don't even have skates,' answered Levin, wondering at this courage and looseness in her presence and not losing sight of her for a second, even though he did not look at her.
He felt the sun approaching him.
She was on the coal and, dumbly, put narrow legs in your boots, apparently a robe, rolled toward him, desperately waving his hands and bent to the ground, a boy in a Russian dress overtaking her.
She didn't roll very hard; when she took her hands out of the little muft hanging on the snork, she kept them ready and, looking at Levin, whom she recognized, smiled at him and her fear.
When the turn was over, she gave herself a lift with a firm foot, and went straight to Shcherbatsky; and she grasped him with her hand, smiling, and nodded to Levin.
She was more beautiful than he imagined.
When he thought of her, he could imagine her alive, especially the beauty of this one, with the expression of child's clarity and kindness, a small blonde head so freely placed on her chick's shoulders.
The child's expression of her face in connection with the fine beauty of the camp was her special beauty, which he well remembered; but what always, as surprise struck her, was the expression of her eyes, mild, calm, and truthful, and especially her smile, which always carried Levin to a magical world, where he felt comfortable and softened, as he could remember in the rare days of his early childhood.
'How long have you been here? 'She said, giving him her hand.' 'Thank you,' she added when he lifted the handkerchief that fell out of her muft.
'I am? I was recently, I was yesterday... I mean... I arrived today,' answered Levin, not all of a sudden, when I realized her question. 'I wanted to go to you,' he said, and immediately, remembering the purpose with which he had sought her, confused and blushed. 'I didn't know you were ice skating, and you ride perfectly.
She looked closely at him as if she wanted to understand why he was embarrassed.
'Your praise should be appreciated.
There was a tradition here that you were the best skater,' she said, shaking a little pen in a black glove of needles that fell on the muft.
'Yes, I used to drive with passion; I wanted to go to perfection.
'You all seem to be doing with passion,' she said, smiling. 'I'm so excited to see you ride.
Put on your skates, and let's ride together.
"Ride together!
Is that possible?" 'I thought Levin looked at her.'
'I will now put on,' he said, and he went to put on skates.
'It has been a long time since we were here, sir,' said the conductor, supporting his leg and swollen heel. 'There are no masters after you.'
Is that gonna be good? 'He said, pulling his belt.'
'Okay, okay, quickly, please,' answered Levnn, struggling to keep a smile of happiness on his face.
'Yes,' he thought, 'this is life, this is happiness!
Together, she said, let's ride together.
Tell her now?
But that's why I'm afraid to say that I'm happy now, happy at least with hope...
And then?
Wow! No, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no.
Get away from weakness!"
Levin came on his feet, took off his coat, and ran off on the shrub by the ice house, ran out onto the smooth ice, and rolled without effort, as if by his own will he was hurrying, twirling, and running.
He approached her with a shyness, but again her smile calmed him down.
She gave him her hand, and they went near him, increasing the pace, and the faster she pressed his hand.
'I would rather learn with you, I am somehow certain of you,' she said to him.
'And I am sure of myself when you lean on me,' he said, but immediately he was afraid of what he said and blushed.
And indeed, as soon as he said those words, suddenly the sun set after the clouds, her face lost all its sweetness, and Levin recognized the familiar game of her face, which meant an effort of thought: her wrinkled on her smooth forehead.
'Do you have anything unpleasant?'
But I have no right to ask,' he quickly said.
'Why?'
No, I have nothing unpleasant,' she replied, cold and immediately added:--Did you see mademoiselle Linon?
'Not yet.
'Come to her, she loves you so much.'
"What is it?
I upset her.
Lord, help me!" 'I thought Levin and ran to the old French woman with the gray bouquets sitting on the bench.'
Smileing and putting out her fake teeth, she met him as an old friend.
'Yeah, here we are,' she said to him, pointing her eyes at Kitty, 'and we are getting old.
Tiny Bear is already big!' continued the French woman laughing, and reminded him of his joke about three young ladies he called three bears from an English fairy tales. 'Remember what you used to say?
He was determined not to remember it, but she had laughed and loved it for ten years.
'Well, go, go for a ride.'
It's been a good ride for Kitty, isn't it?
When Levin ran up to Kitty again, her face was no longer strict, her eyes looked equally truthful and gentle, but Levin felt that she had a special, deliberately calm tone.
And he got sad. Talking about her old governess, her weirdness, she asked him about his life.
'Aren't you bored in the winter in the village? 'She said.'
'No, I'm not bored, I'm very busy,' he said, feeling that she was subjugating her calm tone from which he would not be able to escape, just as it was at the beginning of winter.
'How long have you been here?' 'Cause Kitty asked him.
'I don't know,' he answered without thinking about what he was saying.
The thought that if he gave in to her tone of quiet friendship, he would leave again without a decision, and came to him, and he was indignant.
'How do you not know?'
'I don't know.
That's up to you,' he said, and immediately he was horrified by his words.
Whether she heard his words or didn't want to hear it, she kind of tripped over two times with her foot, and then rushed away from him. She drove up to m-lle Linon, said something to her, and went to the house where the ladies filmed skates.
"Oh, my God, what did I do!
Oh, my God! 'Help me, teach me,' said Levin, praying, yet feeling the need for strong movement, running away and writing out external and internal circles.
At that time, one of the young men, the best of the new skaters, with a papyro in his mouth, in his skates, came out of the coffee shop and, running away, walked down the steps, thundering and jumping.
He flew downstairs, and without even changing his hands, he rolled on the ice.
'Oh, it's a new thing! 'Said Levin, and immediately ran upstairs to make this new thing.
'Don't worry, you've got to get used to it! 'Called him Nikolai Shcherbatsky.'
Levin entered into the attacks, ran from above as much as he could, and went down, holding the balance with his hands in an unusual motion.
At the last stage, he got caught, but when he touched the ice with his hand, he made a strong move, managed and laughed and rolled on.
"Great, sweet," thought Kitty at that time, walking out of the house with m-lle Linon and looking at him with a smile of quiet affection, like her beloved brother.
"Is it my fault that I did anything wrong?
They say flirty.
I know I don't love him, but I'm having fun with him, and he's so sweet.
Why would he say that?" 'I thought she did.'
When she saw Kitty leaving and her mother meeting her on the steps, Levin turned red after a rapid movement and stopped and thought.
He took off his skates and caught up with his mother and daughter at the garden exit.
'It is very good to see you,' said the Princess. 'Thursdays, as always, we accept.
'So now?'
'It is very good to see you,' said the Princess, dryly.
The dryness upset Kitty, and she couldn't resist wanting to make up for her mother's coldness.
She turned her head and said with a smile:
'Goodbye.
At that time, Stepan Arkadić, with his hat on his side, shiny face and eyes, entered the garden with a happy winner.
But when he approached his mother-in-law, he answered her questions about Dolly's health with a sad, guilty face. When he spoke quietly and was depressed with his mother - in - law, he straightened his chest and took it under Levin's hand.
'Well, shall we go?' 'He asked.' 'I've been thinking about you, and I'm very glad you came,' he said, looking him in the eye with a large view.
'Come on, let's go!' answered happy Levin, who kept hearing the sound of the voice, saying, 'Goodbye,' and seeing the smile with whom it was said.
'Anglia or Ermitage?'
'I don't care.
'Well, in England,' said Stepan Arkadych, choosing England because he had more to do with England than Ermitage. That's why he didn't think it was good to avoid this hotel. 'Do you have a driver?'
That's great, 'cause I let the carriage go.
All the way, buddies kept quiet.
Levin thought about what this change of expression meant on Kitty's face, and he assured himself that there was hope, then he went into despair and clearly saw that his hope was insane, yet he felt like a completely different person than he had been before her smile and goodbye.
Stepan Arkadić, dear, wrote the menu.
'You like turban, don't you? 'He said to Levin, coming.'
'What? 'I asked Levin again. 'Turbo?
Yeah, I'm awfully fond of turbo.
When Levin entered the hotel with Oblonski, he could not help but notice a certain feature of the expression, as if it were a discreet radiance, on the face and in the entire figure of Stepan Arkadiyić. Olonian took off his coat and in his hat he went to the cafeteria, giving orders to the tatars who were sticking to him in fraccoes and napkins.
He bowed to the right and to the left, and here, as he was everywhere happy to meet his acquaintances, he went up to the buffet, bit the vodka with a fish, and said something like that, painted in ribbons, laces and curls of a French woman sitting behind her office, that even this French woman laughed sincerely. Levin only did not drink vodka, which was offensive to him by this French woman, all of whom seemed to be of foreign hair, poudre de riz and vinaigre de toilette.
He walked away from her like a filthy place. His whole soul was full of a memory of Kitty, and his eyes glowed with a smile of celebration and happiness.
'This way, your ladyship, perhaps won't be disturbed here, Your ladyship,' said especially the sticky old bleached tantar with a wide pelvis and the fracco falds that passed over it. 'Perhaps, Your Ladyship,' he said to Levin, in tribute to Stepan Arkadyich, taking care of his guest.
In an instant, by spreading a fresh tablecloth to a table table already covered by the tablecloth under the bronze brow, he moved the velvet chairs and stopped in front of Stepan Arkadić with a napkin and a card in his hand, waiting for orders.
'If you wish, Your Ladyship, a separate cabinet will now speak: Prince Golitsyn with the lady.
The oysters are fresh.
'Ah! oysters.
Stepan Arkadych thought about it.
'Aren't you going to change the plan, Levin? 'He said, stopping his finger on the map.' And his face was very perplexed. 'Are the oysters good?
Look at that!
'Flensburg, Your Ladyship, no Ostendian.
'Flexburg is flexburg, isn't it?
'Yesterday has been received.'
'Well, shall we start with the oysters and then change the whole plan?' Huh?
'I don't care.
I'm better than stings and porridge, but it's not here.
'Kasha and la Russ, will you order me? 'Tatarine said, as a nanny over a child, bent over Levin.
'No, without joking about what you choose, that's fine.
I was skating, and I'm hungry.
And don't think,' he added, with a disgruntled expression on his face,'so I wouldn't appreciate your choice.
I'd love to eat well.
'Of course I am!
Saying nothing, it is one of the pleasures of life,' said Stepan Arkadić. 'Well, give us, my brother, oysters two, or little -- three dozen, root soup...'
'Prentier,' picked up the Tartarin.
But Stepan Arkadić apparently didn't want to give him the pleasure of calling it a French cuisine.
'With roots, you know?
Then a turban under thick sauce, then a roast beef, make sure it's good.
Yeah, a little bit of canned food, huh?
Tartarin, after remembering the manner of Stepan Arkadyich not calling the cuisine on the French map, did not repeat it, but took pleasure in repeating the entire order on the map: "Soup prentier, Turbo Soos Bomarche, Pulard a Lestragon, Maseduan de Frye..." -- and immediately, as in springs, by putting one interlocked map and picking up the other, the wine map, brought it to Stepan Arkadyich.
'What shall we drink?'
'I want only a little champagne,' said Levin.
'How? First?
It's true, though, isn't it?
Do you like a white seal?
'Cache blan,' picked up the Tartarin.
'Well, give this stamp to the oysters, and it will be visible.'
'I'm listening.' What do you want me to do?
'Nyui, hand it over.' No, I'd rather have a classic shabby.
'I'm listening.'
Would you like your cheese?
'Yes, the parmesan.
Or do you like someone else?
'No, I don't care,' said Levin.
And the thatar with the falds flying over the wide pelvis ran and five minutes later flew in with a dish open on the perlamute shells of oysters and a bottle between the fingers.
Stepan Arkadić snatched the napkin, shoved it behind his vest, and put his hands to rest, took up the oysters.
'And they are not bad,' he said, snatching a silver fork with a perlamoured sink of oysters who snatch them one after the other. 'Not bad,' he repeated, throwing damp and shiny eyes at Levin and the Tartarin.
Levin also ate oysters, although white bread and cheese were better for him.
But he was staring at Oblonsky.
Even the thatarin, who ditched the cork and spilled the playful wine through thin, thin glasses, with a visible smile of pleasure, correcting his white tie, looked at Stepan Arkadjić.
'Aren't you very fond of oysters? 'Stepan Arkadić said, drinking his glass,' or are you concerned?
He wanted Levin to have fun.
But Levin wasn't fun, he was shy.
With what he had in his soul, he felt awful and uncomfortable in the inn, between the offices where they had lunch with the ladies, in the midst of this running and cluttering; this atmosphere of bronze, mirrors, gas, Tatars -- all of which was offensive to him.
He was afraid to get dirty with his soul.
Yes, I am concerned; but I am also embarrassed by it,' he said. 'You can't imagine how for me, a villager, it's all wild as the fingernails of the gentleman I've seen with you...'
'Yes, I saw that you were very interested in poor Greenevich's fingernails,' said Stepan Arkadić, laughing.
'I can't,' answered Levin. 'Thou shalt try, enter into me, thou shalt see the point of view of the villagers.'
We in the village try to put our hands in such a position as to make it convenient for them to work; to do so, we cut off our nails, sometimes we snatch our sleeves.
And then people let their nails loose on purpose, as long as they can hold on, and they stick them in the form of platter cufflinks so they can't do anything with their hands.
Stepan Arkadić smiled funny.
'Yes, it is a sign that he does not need hard labour.
He's got a mind...
'Maybe. But I'm still crazy, just as I'm crazy now that we village people are trying to get ready to do our job, and you and I are trying not to eat as much as we can and eat oysters...
'Well, of course,' picked up Stepan Arkadić. 'But that's the goal of education: to make everything a pleasure.'
'Well, if that's the goal, I'd like to be wild,
'You're already a dick...'
You're all Wild Levins.
Levin sighed.
He remembered his brother Nikolai, and he felt shame and pain, and he frowned; but Oblonsky spoke of an object that immediately distracted him.
'Well, you'll go to ours tonight, to Shcherbatsky's?' 'He said, pushing aside empty woolly shells, bringing cheese and much shiny eyes.'
'Yes, I will certainly go,' answered Levin. 'But it seemed to me that the Princess was reluctant to call me.
'Oh, come on!
That's bullshit!
It's her manner...
Come on, brother, soup!
That's her manner, grande dame,' said Stepan Arkadić. 'I will come, too, but I have to sing to Countess Banina.
How come you're not a dick?
How do you explain that you suddenly disappeared from Moscow?
The Scherbatskys have been asking me about you as if I should know.
All I know is that you always do things nobody does.
'Yes,' said Levin slowly and excitedly. 'You're right, I'm a dick.
But my savagery isn't that I left, it's that I'm here now.
Now I'm here.
'Oh, you are so lucky! 'Stepan Arkadić caught up, looking at Levin's eyes.
'Why?
'I recognize the horses of revulsion by some of their tavres, and I recognize the young men of love by their eyes,' said Stepan Arkadić. 'You've got everything ahead of you.
'Do you have any backs?'
'No, don't go back, but you have a future, and I have a real one.
'Why?
'No, it's not.
Well, I want to talk about myself, and I can't explain everything,' said Stepan Arkadić. 'So why did you come to Moscow?'
Hey, take it! 'He cried out to the Tartarin.'
'Do you have any idea?' 'O Levin answered, not coming down from Stepan Arkadych into the depths of his glowing eyes.'
'I can guess, but I can't start talking about it. You can see from that whether or not I can guess,' said Stepan Arkadić, with a subtle smile looking at Levin.
'What will you tell me?' 'O Levin said with a trembling voice, and feeling that all the muscles were shaking on his face.' 'How do you feel about that?
Stepan Arkadič slowly drank his glass of shebly, keeping an eye on Levin.
'I am? 'Stepan Arkadić said,' I would not wish for anything like this.
It's the best thing that could've happened.
'But you're not wrong?
Do you know what we're talking about? 'Speaks Levin with his eyes soaking in his interviewer.' 'Do you think that's possible?
'I think it's possible.
Why isn't it possible?
'No, you really think that's possible?
No, you tell me everything you think!
Well, what if I'm gonna say no?
And I'm pretty sure...
'Why do you think that?' 'Smile at his excitement,' said Stepan Arkadić.
'That's what I think sometimes.
'Cause it's gonna be awful for me and for her.
'Well, there's nothing terrible about a girl here anyway.
Every girl is proud of the offer.
'Yes, every girl, but not her.
Stepan Arkadić smiled.
He knew so well this feeling of Levin, knew that for him all the girls in the world were divided into two classes: one class is all the girls in the world except her, and these girls have all the human weaknesses, and the girls are very common; the other class is one, without any weakness, and above all human beings.
'Wait, take the sauce,' he said, holding Levin's hand, who pushed the sauce away from him.
Levin humbled himself with sauce, but did not give Stepan Arkadyich any food.
'No, you wait, you wait,' he said. 'You realize this is a matter of life and death for me.
I never talked to anyone about it. And I can't talk to anyone about it like you.
I know you love me and understand me, and I love you awfully, but for God's sake, be honest.
'I tell you what I think,' said Stepan Arkadić smiling. 'But I will tell you more: my wife is an amazing woman...' Stepan Arkadić sighed, remembering his relationship with his wife, and, silently, continued:--she has a gift of anticipation.
She sees people through; but that is not enough -- she knows what will happen, especially with regard to marriage.
She, for example, predicted that Shahovsky would marry Brenteln.
No one wanted to believe it, but that's what happened.
And she's on your side.
'What do you mean?
'So it is not enough that she loves you,' she says that Kitty will be your wife.
With these words, Levin's face suddenly shined with a smile, the one close to the tears of comfort.
'She says so! 'Screamed Levin.' 'I always said she was lovely, your wife.
That's enough, that's enough to talk about,' he said, standing up.
'All right, but sit down.
But Levin couldn't sit.
He walked through the cage room twice, winked his eyes so he wouldn't see any tears, and then he sat down again at the table.
'You understand,' he said, 'that this is not love.'
I was in love, but that's not it.
It's not my feeling, it's some power outside me.
'Cause I left because I thought it couldn't be, you know, like happiness that doesn't exist on earth, but I fought with myself and I see that there's no life without it.
And we have to decide...
'Why did you leave?'
'Oh, wait!
Ah, so many thoughts!
How many questions do I have to ask!
Listen.
You can't imagine what you did for me with what you said.
I'm so happy that I've even become a creep; I've forgotten everything...
I found out today that Nikolai's brother... you know, he's here... I forgot about him, too.
I think he's happy too.
It's kind of crazy.
But one terrible thing...
You get married, you know that feeling... it's terrible that we're old, with past... not love, but sins... suddenly get close to a pure, innocent being; it's disgusting, so you can't help but feel unworthy.
'Well, you don't have a lot of sins.'
'Ah, though,' said Levin, 'how repulsively I read my life, I trembling and curse, and bitterly complain...'
Yes.
'Well, that's how the world works,' said Stepan Arkadych.
'One consolation, as in this prayer, which I have always loved, that forgive me not for what I deserve, but for mercy.'
And she can only forgive...
Levin drank his glass, and they shut up. 'There's one more thing I have to tell you.
Do you know Vronsky? 'Stepan Arkadić Levin asked.'
'No, I don't.
Why do you ask?
'Give me another one,' turned Stepan Arkadić to the Tartarin, who was pouring glasses and spinning around them, precisely when it was not needed.
'Why do I need to know Vronsky?'
'And then you will know that Vronsky is one of your competitors.'
'What is Wronsky?' 'Oblonsky said, and his face turned into evil and unpleasant.'
'Vronsky is one of the sons of Count Cyril Ivanovich of Wronski and one of the best samples of the golden youth of Peterburg.
I recognized him in Tveri when I was there, and he came to the recruitment kit.
Scaredly rich, handsome, big connections, plague adutant, and yet very sweet, kind fellow.
But more than just a kind guy.
As I have recognized him here, he is educated and very smart; he is a man who will go far.
Levin frowned and remained silent.
'Well, he came here shortly after you, and I understand that he is in love with Kitty, and you realize that his mother...
'Excuse me, but I don't understand anything,' said Levin, drowningly.
And immediately he remembered his brother Nikolai and how nasty he could have forgotten about him.
'Wait, wait,' said Stepan Arkadić, smiling and touching his hand. 'I told you what I know, and I repeat that in this delicate and delicate matter, as far as I can guess, I think the odds are on your side.
Levin leaned back on his chair, his face was pale.
'But I would advise you to resolve the matter as soon as possible,' continued Oblonsky, sharing a glass with him.
'No, thank you, I can no longer drink,' said Levin, moving his glass away. 'I will be drunk...'
So, how are you? 'He continued, apparently wanting to change the conversation.'
'Another word: In any case, I recommend that the matter be resolved sooner.
Now I do not advise you to speak,' said Stepan Arkadych. 'Go tomorrow morning, classically, to propose, and may God bless you...'
'Well, did you, everyone, want to come to my place to hunt?' Come here in spring,' said Levin.
Now he's all heartbroken that he started this conversation with Stepan Arkadyich.
His special feeling was defiled by the conversation about the competition of some Peterburger officer, the assumptions and advice of Stepan Arkadjić.
He understood what had been done in Levin's soul.
'I will come one day,' he said. 'Yes, brother, women are the screws on which everything is spinning.'
My case is bad, very bad.
All from women.
You tell me frankly,' he continued, delivering the cigar and holding his hand by the glass, 'you give me advice.
'But what is it?
'Here's the thing.
Let's say you're married, you love your wife, but you're attracted to another woman...
'I'm sorry, but I don't really understand it, as if... I still don't understand how I would walk past the pudding room and steal the pussy now that I'm full of food.'
Stepan Arkadyich's eyes are more glitter than usual.
Kalach sometimes smells so bad you can't help yourself. Himmlich ist's, Wenn ich bezwungen Meine irdische Begier; Aber noch Wenn's nicht gelungen, Hatt'ich auch recht Hubsch Plaisir!
Speaking of which, Stepan Arkadych, smiled thinly. Levin too could not help smiling.
'Yes, but no joke,' continued Oblonsky. 'You understand that a woman, a sweet, gentle, loving creature, poor, alone, and sacrificed everything.'
Now that it's done, you understand, will you leave her?
Let's say break up so that you don't ruin your family life, but don't you feel sorry for it, don't set it up, relax it?
'Well, if you'll excuse me.
You know, for me, all women are divided into two kinds... I mean, no... well, there are women, and there are...
I haven't seen or seen any beautiful fallen creatures, and those like that painted French woman at the office, with the curls -- they're the same for me, and all the fallen ones are the same.
'And the Evangelian?'
'Oh, come on!
Christ would never say those words if he knew how to abuse them.
All the Gospels remember these words.
But I'm not saying what I think, I'm saying what I feel.
I'm disgusted with fallen women.
You're scared of spiders, and I'm the bastards.
I mean, you probably didn't study spiders and you don't know their manners, so do I.
'It is good for you to say so; it is still like this savage master who throws all the difficult questions over his right shoulder with his left hand.
But denying the fact is not an answer.
What are you gonna do, tell me what to do?
Your wife's getting old, and you're full of life.
You won't have time to look back, like you already feel that you can't love your wife's love, no matter how much you respect her.
And then all of a sudden, love comes along and you're gone, you're gone! 'Stepan Arkadić said with sad despair.'
Levin laughed.
'Yes, and went missing,' continued Oblonsky. 'But what shall we do?'
'Don't steal punks.
Stepan Arkadić laughed.
'O moralist!
But you understand, there are two women: one insists only on his rights, and these rights are your love, which you cannot give her; and the other sacrificeth you all, and demands nothing.
What do you want to do?
What should I do?
It's a terrible drama.
'If you want my confession about it, I'll tell you I don't believe there's a drama.
And that's why. I think love... both love that you remember -- Plato defines in his Pira, both love as a test stone for people.
Some people understand only one, others.
And those who understand only non-plonical love talk about drama in vain.
With such love, there can be no drama.
"Thank you very much for your pleasure, my honor," that's the drama.
And for platonic love, there can be no drama, because in such love everything is clear and clear, because...
At that moment Levin remembered his sins and the internal struggle he had endured. And he suddenly added:
'But maybe you're right.
It's very possible...
But I don't know, I don't know.
'You see,' said Stepan Arkadić, 'you are a very whole man.
It's your quality and your weakness.
You're the whole person, and you want your whole life to be made up of whole things, and that doesn't happen.
You despise public service because you want it to be consistent with its purpose, and it doesn't happen.
You want one person's activities to always have a purpose, love and family life to be the same. It doesn't happen.
All the diversity, all the beauty, all the beauty of life comes from the shadow and the light.
Levin sighed and answered nothing.
He thought of his own and did not listen to Oblonsky.
And suddenly they both felt that even though they were friends, even though they ate together and drank wine that would bring them even closer together, but that each thought was nothing but his own, and that one did not care about the other.
Oblonsky has already experienced this afternoon's extreme bickering instead of getting closer and has known what to do in these cases.
'The bill! 'He screamed and went out to the next room, where he immediately met a friend of his, and entered into a conversation with him about the actress and her host.'
And immediately, in a conversation with Adjutant Oblonsky, he felt relieved and rested from talking to Levin, who always called him on too much mental and mental stress.
When the Tartarin showed up with twenty-six rubles of penny and a vodka supplement, Levin, who at another time as a villager would be horrified by his share of fourteen rubles, now ignored it, paid off, and went home to change and go to the Shcherbatskys, where his fate would be decided.
Princess Kitty Scherbatsky was 18 years old. She was leaving for the first winter.
Her success in the light was greater than both of her older sisters, and more than the Princess even expected.
Not only were the boys dancing at the Moscow balls almost all in love with Kitty, but during the first winter two major parties appeared: Levin and, immediately after his departure, Count Wronsky.
Levin's appearance at the beginning of winter, his frequent visits, and his apparent love for Kitty were the first serious discussions between Kitty's parents about her future and the disputes between the Prince and the Princess.
The Prince was on Levin's side, saying he didn't want anything better for Kitty.
The Princess, on the other hand, with the custom of women to go around the question, said that Kitty was too young, that Levin showed nothing that had serious intentions, that Kitty had no affection for him, and that other arguments; but she did not say the main thing, that she was waiting for the best party for her daughter, and that Levin was unsatisfied with her, and that she did not understand him.
But when Levin suddenly left, the Princess was pleased and said to her husband, "You see, I was right."
She was even more pleased with her belief that Kitty should make not only a good but a brilliant party.
For the mother, there could be no comparison between Vronsky and Levin.
Her mother didn't like Levin and his strange and harsh judgment, and his awkwardness in the light, based on what she thought was pride, and his, in her mind, wild life in the village, with animal and man activities; he didn't like very much that he, in love with her daughter, drove into the house for a month and a half, something as if he was waiting, looking as if he was afraid, wouldn't be honored if he made an offer, and he didn't realize that going to the house where the bride's girlfriend had to explain himself. And suddenly, without explanation, he left.
"It's a good thing he's so unattractive that Kitty didn't fall in love with him," the mother thought.
He satisfied all his mother's wishes.
Very rich, smart, well-known, on the way to a brilliant military career and a fascinating man.
You couldn't have wanted anything better.
He clearly looked after Kitty at the balls, danced with her, and went to the house, and there was no doubt about the seriousness of his intentions.
But despite that, the mother was in a state of anxiety and anxiety throughout the winter.
The Princess herself was married 30 years ago, by the marriage of her aunt.
The bridegroom, all of which was well known, came, saw the bride, and saw him; the wife of the aunt recognized and gave a mutual impression; the impression was good; then, on the appointed day, the offer was made to the parents and accepted.
It was very easy and simple.
At least that's what the Princess thought.
But on her daughters, she experienced how difficult and not just this seemingly ordinary thing to do -- to marry daughters.
How many fears have survived, how many thoughts have changed, how much money has been spent, how many clashes with a husband in the marriage of the older two, Daria and Natalia!
Now, when the smaller ones were taken out, the same fears, the same doubts, and even more than the older ones were fighting with their husband.
The old prince, like all fathers, was particularly sensitive about the honour and purity of his daughters; he was recklessly jealous of his daughters, especially Kitty, who was his favorite, and made scenes at every step of the way for the Princess to compromise her daughter.
The Princess was used to it with her first daughters, but now she felt that the Prince's sensitivity was more justified.
She had seen that much had changed recently in social attitudes, and that the responsibilities of the mother had become even more difficult.
She saw Kitty's peers make up some kind of society, go to some kind of class, treat men freely, drive around the streets alone, many didn't sit down, and, above all, she was firmly convinced that choosing a husband was their business, not their parents.
"You don't get married like you used to," thought and said all these young girls and all old people.
But now they're getting married, the Princess couldn't tell from anyone.
The French custom of parents deciding their children &apos; s fate was not accepted, condemned.
The English custom -- the girl &apos; s perfect freedom -- was also not accepted and impossible in Russian society.
The Russian custom of mating was seen as something ugly, laughed at, all and the Princess herself.
But no one knew how to get married.
Everyone with whom the Princess has interpreted this has said to her one thing: "Please, it is time to leave this old man alone in our time.
Indeed, the young people should marry, not their parents, so that they should leave them as they know.'
But it was good to say so to those who did not have daughters; and the Princess knew that when she was near, the daughter could fall in love, and fall in love with someone who did not want to marry, or with someone who was not fit for marriage.
And no matter how much the Princess was told that in our time young people had to set their own destiny, she could not believe it, nor could she believe that the best toys for five-year-olds at any time should be loaded pistols.
And that's why the Princess was more concerned with Kitty than with her older daughters.
Now, she was afraid that Wronsky wouldn't just take care of her daughter.
She saw that her daughter was already in love with him, but comforted herself that he was an honest man and would not do so.
At the same time, however, she knew how with the current freedom of treatment it was easy for the girl's head to spin and how easy men were to look at that guilt.
Kitty told her mother last week that she had a conversation with Vronski during the jerk-off.
This conversation calmed the Princess in part; but she could not be completely calm.
Not to mention that they, both brothers, were so used to submitting to their mother that they would never decide to do anything important without consulting her.
"And now I'm waiting for my mother's arrival from Petersburg as a special happiness," he said.
Kitty said that without giving any meaning to those words.
But my mother didn't understand it that way.
She knew that the old woman was waiting from day to day, knew that the old woman would be happy to choose her son, and she was surprised that he was afraid to insult his mother and did not propose; however, she wanted to marry herself and, above all, to calm her fears that she had believed it.
As bitter as it was now for the Princess to see the misfortune of Dolly's eldest daughter, who was about to leave her husband, the worry about the fate of her little daughter absorbed all her feelings.
The current day, with Levin's appearance, added to her concern.
She feared that her daughter, who seemed at one time to have a feeling for Levin, out of excessive honesty, would not have refused Wronski, and that Levin's arrival would not have been confused at all, would not have delayed a matter so close to the end.
'What is he, how long has he been here?' 'The Princess said of Levin when they returned home.'
'Now, maman.
'I have one thing to say,' the Princess began, and Kitty guessed what she was talking about.
'Mom,' she said, when she flashed and turned to her quickly, 'please, please don't say anything about it.
I know, I know.
She wanted what her mother wanted, but her mother's motives insulted her.
'I just want to say that by giving hope to one...
'Mommy, my love, for God's sake, don't tell me.
It's so scary to talk about.
'I will not, I will not,' said the mother, when she saw tears in front of her daughter, 'but one thing, my soul, you promised me that you would have no secret from me. Not gonna happen?
'Never, Mother, no one,' replied Kitty, blushing and looking straight at her mother's face. 'But I have nothing to say now.' I... I... if I wanted to, I don't know what to say or how... I don't know...
"No, she can't tell the truth with those eyes," the mother thought, smiling at her excitement and happiness.
The Princess smiled at how huge and much she felt, the poor thing, what was happening in her soul now.
Kitty felt after lunch and before the beginning of the evening, a feeling similar to that of the young man before the battle.
Her heart was beating hard, and she couldn't stop thinking.
She felt that this evening, when they both first met, must be decisive in her destiny. And she always imagined them, then each one apart, then together.
When she thought of her past, she was happy, tenderly, to dwell on the memories of her relationship with Levin.
The memories of her childhood and of Levin's friendship with her dead brother gave her special poetic beauty to her relationship with him.
His love for her, which she was certain of, was flattering and joyful to her. And it was easy for her to remember Levin.
But there was something embarrassing in his memory, even though he was a highly secular and calm man; as if there was some kind of lie -- not in him, he was very simple and sweet -- but in her herself, while with Levin she felt very simple and clear.
But as soon as she was thinking about the future with Wronski, the prospect was bright and happy; with Levin, the future seemed vague.
When she went upstairs to dress for the evening and looked in the mirror, she was happy to see that she was in one of her good days and full possession of all her strength, and that was what she needed for the coming: she felt the external silence and the free grace of the movements.
At half past eight, she just went to the living room, and the footman reported, "Constantin Dmitrich Levin."
The Princess was still in her room, and the Prince did not leave.
"It is," thought Kitty, and all the blood was poured into her heart.
She was horrified by her paleness, looking in the mirror.
Now she knew correctly that he had come earlier to find her alone and propose.
And it was only the first time that the whole thing appeared to her on a completely different side, a new side.
She was the only one who realized that the question wasn't about her alone -- who she'd be happy with and who she loved -- but that right now she had to insult the person she loved. And insult me cruelly...
For what?
Because he, sweetheart, loves her, is in love with her.
But there's nothing to do, it's to be done, it's to be done.
"Oh, my God, am I supposed to tell him myself? 'She thought.' 'What shall I tell him?
Am I gonna tell him I don't love him?
That wouldn't be true.
What am I gonna tell him?
I'll tell you I love someone else?
No, that's impossible.
I'm gonna go, I'm gonna go."
She was already approaching the door when she heard his footsteps.
"No! No! It's not fair.
What should I be afraid of?
I didn't do anything wrong.
What's going to happen is what's going to happen! I'll tell you the truth.
It can't be awkward with him.
'Here he is,' she said to herself, seeing all his strong and shy figure with shiny, glittering eyes.
She looked directly into his face, as if begging him for mercy, and gave her hand.
'I think it's too early in time,' he said, looking around the empty living room.
When he saw that his expectations had come true, that nothing prevented him from speaking out, his face turned dark.
'No,' said Kitty, and sat down to the table.
'But all I wanted to do was catch you alone,' he began, neither sitting down nor looking at her, in order not to lose his courage.
'Mommy will be right out.
She was very tired yesterday. Yesterday...
She spoke, not knowing what her lips were saying, and not letting him down with a begging and caressing look...
He looked at her, and she was red and silent.
'I told you that I don't know if I've been here long... that it's up to you...
She bowed her head down and down, not knowing herself that she would respond to the approaching one.
'It depends on you,' he repeated. 'I mean... I mean...
I came here to be my wife! he said, without knowing what he was saying; but when he felt that the worst thing was said, he stopped and looked at her.
She was breathing hard without looking at him.
She was excited.
Her soul was full of happiness.
She did not expect his love to impress her so much.
But it only lasted for one moment.
She remembered Wronsky. She looked at Levin with her bright, true eyes and, when she saw his desperate face, answered in haste:
'It can't be... Forgive me...'
Like a minute ago, she was close to him, how important to his life!
And now she's a stranger and a stranger to him!
'It could not have been otherwise,' he said, without looking at her. He bowed and wanted to leave...
But that's when the Princess came out.
The horror on her face was when she saw them alone and their decomposed faces.
Levin bowed to her and said nothing.
Kitty kept her eyes shut.
"Thank God she refused," the mother thought, and her face shone with a simple smile, with which she met her guests on Thursdays.
She sat down and began to question Levin about his life in the village.
He sat down again, waiting for the guests to come to leave without being seen.
Five minutes later, Kitty's friend came in, married last winter, Countess Nordston.